Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 7.105.105 and 2022 c 268 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:The following apply to all petitions for protection orders under this chapter.(1)(a) ((By January 1, 2023, county))County clerks on behalf of all superior courts and, by January 1, 2026, all courts of limited jurisdiction, must permit petitions for protection orders and all other filings in connection with the petition to be submitted as preferred by the petitioner either: (i) In person; (ii) remotely through an electronic submission process; or (iii) by mail for persons who are incarcerated or who are otherwise unable to file in person or remotely through an electronic system. The court or clerk must make available electronically to judicial officers any protection orders filed within the state. Judicial officers may not be charged for access to such documents. The electronic submission system must allow for petitions for protection orders and supportive documents to be submitted at any time of the day. When a petition and supporting documents for a protection order are submitted to the clerk after business hours, they must be processed as soon as possible on the next judicial day. Petitioners and respondents should not incur additional charges for electronic submission for petitions and documents filed pursuant to this section.(b) ((By January 1, 2023, all))All superior courts' systems and, by January 1, 2026, all limited jurisdiction courts' systems, should allow for the petitioner to electronically track the progress of the petition for a protection order. Notification from the court or clerk may be provided by text messaging or email, and should provide reminders of court appearances and alert the petitioner when the following occur: (i) The petition has been processed and is under review by a judicial officer; (ii) the order has been signed; (iii) the order has been transmitted to law enforcement for entry into the Washington crime information center system; (iv) proof of service upon the respondent has been filed with the court or clerk; (v) a receipt for the surrender of firearms has been filed with the court or clerk; ((and)) (vi) the respondent has filed a motion for the release of surrendered firearms; and (vii) 90 days before the expiration of the order. Respondents, once served, should be able to sign up for similar electronic notification. Petitioners and respondents should not be charged for electronic notification.(2) The petition must be accompanied by a confidential document to be used by ((the)) courts ((and)), law enforcement, and prosecutors' offices to fully identify the parties ((and)); serve the respondent; enable notification of victims or protected persons; or otherwise fulfill the identification, service, enforcement, and notification requirements of chapter 9.41, 36.28A, or 2.56 RCW or this chapter. This record will be exempt from public disclosure at all times, and restricted access to this form is governed by general rule 22 provisions governing access to the confidential information form. If the confidential information form is wrongfully disclosed, the court shall issue a protective order on the court's own initiative, or upon notice of the disclosure, and if necessary, order sealing under applicable law. The petitioner is required to fill out the confidential party information form to the petitioner's fullest ability. The respondent should be provided a blank confidential party information form at the time of service, and when the respondent first appears, the respondent must confirm with the court the respondent's identifying and current contact information, including electronic means of contact, and file this with the court.(3) A petition must be accompanied by a declaration signed under penalty of perjury stating the specific facts and circumstances for which relief is sought. Parties, attorneys, and witnesses may electronically sign sworn statements in all filings.(4) The petitioner and the respondent must disclose the existence of any other litigation or of any other restraining, protection, or no-contact orders between the parties, to the extent that such information is known by the petitioner and the respondent. To the extent possible, the court shall take judicial notice of any existing restraining, protection, or no-contact orders between the parties before entering a protection order. The court shall not include provisions in a protection order that would allow the respondent to engage in conduct that is prohibited by another restraining, protection, or no-contact order between the parties that was entered in a different proceeding. The obligation to disclose the existence of any other litigation includes, but is not limited to, the existence of any other litigation concerning the custody or residential placement of a child of the parties as set forth in RCW 26.27.281. The court administrator shall verify for the court the terms of any existing protection order governing the parties.(5) The petition may be made regardless of whether or not there is a pending lawsuit, complaint, petition, or other action between the parties, except in cases where the court has realigned the parties in accordance with RCW 7.105.210.(6) Relief under this chapter must not be denied or delayed on the grounds that the relief is available in another action. The court shall not defer acting on a petition for a protection order nor grant a petitioner less than the full relief that the petitioner is otherwise entitled to under this chapter because there is, or could be, another proceeding involving the parties including, but not limited to, any potential or pending family law matter or criminal matter.(7) A person's right to petition for relief under this chapter is not affected by the person leaving his or her residence or household.(8) A petitioner is not required to post a bond to obtain relief in any proceeding for a protection order.(9)(a) No fees for service of process may be charged by a court or any public agency to petitioners seeking relief under this chapter. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, courts may not charge petitioners any fees or surcharges the payment of which is a condition precedent to the petitioner's ability to secure access to relief under this chapter. Petitioners shall be provided the necessary number of certified copies, forms, and instructional brochures free of charge, including a copy of the service packet that consists of all documents that are being served on the respondent. A respondent who is served electronically with a protection order shall be provided a certified copy of the order free of charge upon request.(b) A filing fee may be charged for a petition for an antiharassment protection order except as follows:(i) No filing fee may be charged to a petitioner seeking an antiharassment protection order against a person who has engaged in acts of stalking as defined in RCW 9A.46.110, a hate crime under RCW 9A.36.080(1)(c), or a single act of violence or threat of violence under RCW 7.105.010(((36)))(37)(b), or from a person who has engaged in nonconsensual sexual conduct or penetration or conduct that would constitute a sex offense as defined in RCW 9A.44.128, or from a person who is a family or household member or intimate partner who has engaged in conduct that would constitute domestic violence; and(ii) The court shall waive the filing fee if the court determines the petitioner is not able to pay the costs of filing.(10) If the petition states that disclosure of the petitioner's address or other identifying location information would risk harm to the petitioner or any member of the petitioner's family or household, that address may be omitted from all documents filed with the court. If the petitioner has not disclosed an address under this subsection, the petitioner shall designate an alternative address or email address at which the respondent may serve the petitioner.(11) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, or as provided through alternative sources including, but not limited to, grants, local funding, or pro bono means, if the court deems it necessary, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem for a petitioner or a respondent who is under 18 years of age and who is not represented by counsel. If a guardian ad litem is appointed by the court for either or both parties, neither the petitioner nor the respondent shall be required by the court to pay any costs associated with the appointment.(12) If a petitioner has requested an ex parte temporary protection order, because these are often emergent situations, the court shall prioritize review, either entering an order without a hearing or scheduling and holding an ex parte hearing in person, by telephone, by video, or by other electronic means on the day the petition is filed if possible. Otherwise, it must be heard no later than the following judicial day. The clerk shall ensure that the request for an ex parte temporary protection order is presented timely to a judicial officer, and signed orders will be returned promptly to the clerk for entry and to the petitioner as specified in this section.(13) Courts shall not require a petitioner to file duplicative forms.(14) The Indian child welfare act applies in the following manner.(a) In a proceeding under this chapter where the petitioner seeks to protect a minor and the petitioner is not the minor's parent as defined by RCW 13.38.040, the petition must contain a statement alleging whether the minor is or may be an Indian child as defined in RCW 13.38.040. If the minor is an Indian child, chapter 13.38 RCW and the federal Indian child welfare act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq., shall apply. A party should allege in the petition if these laws have been satisfied in a prior proceeding and identify the proceeding.(b) Every order entered in any proceeding under this chapter where the petitioner is not a parent of the minor or minors protected by the order must contain a finding that the federal Indian child welfare act or chapter 13.38 RCW does or does not apply, or if there is insufficient information to make a determination, the court must make a finding that a determination must be made before a full protection order may be entered. If there is reason to know the child is an Indian child, but the court does not have sufficient evidence to determine that the child is or is not an Indian child, 25 C.F.R. Sec. 23.107(b) applies. Where there is a finding that the federal Indian child welfare act or chapter 13.38 RCW does apply, the order must also contain a finding that all notice, evidentiary requirements, and placement preferences under the federal Indian child welfare act and chapter 13.38 RCW have been satisfied, or a finding that removal or placement of the child is necessary to prevent imminent physical damage or harm to the child pursuant to 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1922 and RCW 13.38.140. Where there is a finding that the federal Indian child welfare act or chapter 13.38 RCW does not apply, the order must also contain a finding as to why there is no reason to know the child may be an Indian child.Sec. 2. RCW 7.105.310 and 2022 c 268 s 17 and 2022 c 231 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) In issuing any type of protection order, other than an ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order as limited by subsection (2) of this section, and other than an extreme risk protection order, the court shall have broad discretion to grant such relief as the court deems proper, including an order that provides relief as follows:(a) Restrain the respondent from committing any of the following acts against the petitioner and other persons protected by the order: Domestic violence; nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration; sexual abuse; stalking; acts of abandonment, abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation against a vulnerable adult; and unlawful harassment;(b) Restrain the respondent from making any attempts to have contact, including nonphysical contact, with the petitioner or the petitioner's family or household members who are minors or other members of the petitioner's household, either directly, indirectly, or through third parties regardless of whether those third parties know of the order;(c) Exclude the respondent from the residence that the parties share;(d) Exclude the respondent from the residence, workplace, or school of the petitioner; or from the day care or school of a minor child;(e) Restrain the respondent from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified location including, but not limited to, a residence, school, day care, workplace, the protected party's person, and the protected party's vehicle. The specified distance shall presumptively be at least 1,000 feet, unless the court for good cause finds that a shorter specified distance is appropriate;(f) If the parties have children in common, make residential provisions with regard to their minor children on the same basis as is provided in chapter 26.09 RCW. However, parenting plans as specified in chapter 26.09 RCW must not be required under this chapter. The court may not delay or defer relief under this chapter on the grounds that the parties could seek a parenting plan or modification to a parenting plan in a different action. A protection order must not be denied on the grounds that the parties have an existing parenting plan in effect. A protection order may suspend the respondent's contact with the parties' children under an existing parenting plan, subject to further orders in a family law proceeding;(g) Order the respondent to participate in a state-certified domestic violence perpetrator treatment program approved under RCW 43.20A.735 or a state-certified sex offender treatment program approved under RCW 18.155.070;(h) Order the respondent to obtain a mental health or chemical dependency evaluation. If the court determines that a mental health evaluation is necessary, the court shall clearly document the reason for this determination and provide a specific question or questions to be answered by the mental health professional. The court shall consider the ability of the respondent to pay for an evaluation. Minors are presumed to be unable to pay. The parent or legal guardian is responsible for costs unless the parent or legal guardian demonstrates inability to pay;(i) In cases where the petitioner and the respondent are students who attend the same public or private elementary, middle, or high school, the court, when issuing a protection order and providing relief, shall consider, among the other facts of the case, the severity of the act, any continuing physical danger, emotional distress, or educational disruption to the petitioner, and the financial difficulty and educational disruption that would be caused by a transfer of the respondent to another school. The court may order that the respondent not attend the public or private elementary, middle, or high school attended by the petitioner. If a minor respondent is prohibited attendance at the minor's assigned public school, the school district must provide the student comparable educational services in another setting. In such a case, the district shall provide transportation at no cost to the respondent if the respondent's parent or legal guardian is unable to pay for transportation. The district shall put in place any needed supports to ensure successful transition to the new school environment. The court shall send notice of the restriction on attending the same school as the petitioner to the public or private school the respondent will attend and to the school the petitioner attends;(j) Require the respondent to pay the administrative court costs and service fees, as established by the county or municipality incurring the expense, and to reimburse the petitioner for costs incurred in bringing the action, including reasonable attorneys' fees or limited license legal technician fees when such fees are incurred by a person licensed and practicing in accordance with state supreme court admission and practice rule 28, the limited practice rule for limited license legal technicians. Minors are presumed to be unable to pay. The parent or legal guardian is responsible for costs unless the parent or legal guardian demonstrates inability to pay;(k) Restrain the respondent from harassing, following, monitoring, keeping under physical or electronic surveillance, cyber harassment as defined in RCW 9A.90.120, and using telephonic, audiovisual, or other electronic means to monitor the actions, location, or communication of the petitioner or the petitioner's family or household members who are minors or other members of the petitioner's household. For the purposes of this subsection, "communication" includes both "wire communication" and "electronic communication" as defined in RCW 9.73.260;(l) Other than for respondents who are minors, require the respondent to submit to electronic monitoring. The order must specify who shall provide the electronic monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring must be performed. The order also may include a requirement that the respondent pay the costs of the monitoring. The court shall consider the ability of the respondent to pay for electronic monitoring;(m) Consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800, and order the respondent to surrender, and prohibit the respondent from accessing, having in his or her custody or control, possessing, purchasing, attempting to purchase or receive, or receiving, all firearms, dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license, as required in RCW 9.41.800;(n) Order possession and use of essential personal effects. The court shall list the essential personal effects with sufficient specificity to make it clear which property is included. Personal effects may include pets. The court may order that a petitioner be granted the exclusive custody or control of any pet owned, possessed, leased, kept, or held by the petitioner, respondent, or minor child residing with either the petitioner or respondent, and may prohibit the respondent from interfering with the petitioner's efforts to obtain the pet. The court may also prohibit the respondent from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of specified locations where the pet is regularly found;(o) Order use of a vehicle;(p) Enter an order restricting the respondent from engaging in abusive litigation as set forth in chapter 26.51 RCW or in frivolous filings against the petitioner, making harassing or libelous communications about the petitioner to third parties, or making false reports to investigative agencies. A petitioner may request this relief in the petition or by separate motion. A petitioner may request this relief by separate motion at any time within five years of the date the protection order is entered even if the order has since expired. A stand-alone motion for an order restricting abusive litigation may be brought by a party who meets the requirements of chapter 26.51 RCW regardless of whether the party has previously sought a protection order under this chapter, provided the motion is made within five years of the date the order that made a finding of domestic violence was entered. In cases where a finding of domestic violence was entered pursuant to an order under chapter 26.09, 26.26, or 26.26A RCW, a motion for an order restricting abusive litigation may be brought under the family law case or as a stand-alone action filed under this chapter, when it is not reasonable or practical to file under the family law case;(q) Restrain the respondent from committing acts of abandonment, abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation against a vulnerable adult;(r) Require an accounting by the respondent of the disposition of the vulnerable adult's income or other resources;(s) Restrain the transfer of either the respondent's or vulnerable adult's property, or both, for a specified period not exceeding 90 days;(t) Order financial relief and restrain the transfer of jointly owned assets;(u) Restrain the respondent from possessing or distributing intimate images, as defined in RCW 9A.86.010, depicting the petitioner including, but not limited to, requiring the respondent to: Take down and delete all intimate images and recordings of the petitioner in the respondent's possession or control; and cease any and all disclosure of those intimate images. The court may also inform the respondent that it would be appropriate to ask third parties in possession or control of the intimate images of this protection order to take down and delete the intimate images so that the order may not inadvertently be violated; or(v) Order other relief as it deems necessary for the protection of the petitioner and other family or household members who are minors or vulnerable adults for whom the petitioner has sought protection, including orders or directives to a law enforcement officer, as allowed under this chapter.(2) In an antiharassment protection order proceeding, the court may grant the relief specified in subsection (1)(c), (f), and (t) of this section only as part of a full antiharassment protection order.(3) The court in granting a temporary antiharassment protection order or a civil antiharassment protection order shall not prohibit the respondent from exercising constitutionally protected free speech. Nothing in this section prohibits the petitioner from utilizing other civil or criminal remedies to restrain conduct or communications not otherwise constitutionally protected.(4) The court shall not take any of the following actions in issuing a protection order.(a) The court may not order the petitioner to obtain services including, but not limited to, drug testing, victim support services, a mental health assessment, or a psychological evaluation.(b) The court shall not issue a full protection order to any party except upon notice to the respondent and the opportunity for a hearing pursuant to a petition or counter-petition filed and served by the party seeking relief in accordance with this chapter. Except as provided in RCW 7.105.210, the court shall not issue a temporary protection order to any party unless the party has filed a petition or counter-petition for a protection order seeking relief in accordance with this chapter.(c) Under no circumstances shall the court deny the petitioner the type of protection order sought in the petition on the grounds that the court finds that a different type of protection order would have a less severe impact on the respondent.(5) The order shall specify the date the order expires, if any. For permanent orders, the court shall set the date to expire 99 years from the issuance date. The order shall also state whether the court issued the protection order following personal service, service by electronic means, service by mail, or service by publication, and whether the court has approved service by mail or publication of an order issued under this section.(6) Issuing mutual full protection orders of any type is disfavored.Sec. 3. RCW 7.105.405 and 2024 c 298 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:The following provisions apply to the renewal of all full protection orders issued under this chapter, with the exception of the renewal of extreme risk protection orders.(1) If the court grants a protection order for a fixed time period, the petitioner or protected party may file a motion to renew the order at any time within the 90 days before the order expires. A minor who is or was previously protected by a protection order who has reached the age of 18 may petition for renewal of the order as the petitioner pursuant to subsection (10) of this section. The motion for renewal must state the reasons the petitioner seeks to renew the protection order. Upon receipt of a motion for renewal, the court shall order a hearing, which must be not later than 14 days from the date of the order. Service must be made on the respondent not less than five judicial days before the hearing, as provided in RCW 7.105.150.(2) If the motion for renewal is uncontested and the petitioner seeks no modification of the order, the order may be renewed on the basis of the petitioner's motion and statement of the reason for the requested renewal.(3) The petitioner bears no burden of proving that he or she has a current reasonable fear of harm by the respondent.(4) The court shall grant the motion for renewal unless the respondent proves by a preponderance of the evidence that there has been a substantial change in circumstances and the following:(a) For a domestic violence protection order, that the respondent proves that the respondent will not resume acts of domestic violence against the petitioner or the petitioner's family or household members who are minors or vulnerable adults when the order expires;(b) For a sexual assault protection order, that the respondent proves that the respondent will not engage in, or attempt to engage in, physical or nonphysical contact, or acts of commercial sexual exploitation, with the petitioner when the order expires;(c) For a stalking protection order, that the respondent proves that the respondent will not resume acts of stalking against the petitioner or the petitioner's family or household members when the order expires;(d) For a vulnerable adult protection order, that the respondent proves that the respondent will not resume acts of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect against the vulnerable adult when the order expires; or(e) For an antiharassment protection order, that the respondent proves that the respondent will not resume harassment of the petitioner when the order expires.(5) In determining whether there has been a substantial change in circumstances, the court may consider the following unweighted factors, and no inference is to be drawn from the order in which the factors are listed:(a) Whether the respondent has committed or threatened sexual assault; commercial sexual exploitation; domestic violence; stalking; abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect of a vulnerable adult; or other harmful acts against the petitioner or any other person since the protection order was entered;(b) Whether the respondent has violated the terms of the protection order and the time that has passed since the entry of the order;(c) Whether the respondent has exhibited suicidal ideation or attempts since the protection order was entered;(d) Whether the respondent has been convicted of criminal activity since the protection order was entered;(e) Whether the respondent has either: Acknowledged responsibility for acts of sexual assault, commercial sexual exploitation, domestic violence, or stalking, or acts of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect of a vulnerable adult, or behavior that resulted in the entry of the protection order; or successfully completed state-certified perpetrator treatment or counseling since the protection order was entered;(f) Whether the respondent has a continuing involvement with drug or alcohol abuse, if such abuse was a factor in the protection order; and(g) Other factors relating to a substantial change in circumstances.(6) The court shall not deny a motion to renew a protection order for any of the following reasons:(a) The respondent has not violated the protection order previously issued by the court;(b) The petitioner or the respondent is a minor;(c) The petitioner did not report the conduct giving rise to the protection order, or subsequent violations of the protection order, to law enforcement;(d) A no-contact order or a restraining order that restrains the respondent's contact with the petitioner has been issued in a criminal proceeding or in a domestic relations proceeding;(e) The relief sought by the petitioner may be available in a different action or proceeding;(f) The passage of time since the last incident of conduct giving rise to the issuance of the protection order; or(g) The respondent no longer lives near the petitioner.(7) The terms of the original protection order must not be changed on a motion for renewal unless the petitioner has requested the change.(8) The court may renew the protection order for another fixed time period of no less than one year, or may enter a permanent order as provided in this section.(9) If the protection order includes the parties' children, a renewed protection order may be issued for more than one year, subject to subsequent orders entered in a proceeding under chapter 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW.(10)(a) If a minor who is protected by a protection order reaches the age of 18 while the order is still in effect, the minor may file a motion for a renewal of the order as the petitioner.(b) If a minor who was previously protected by a protection order reaches the age of 18 after the order has expired, the minor has up to one year from the date of expiration of the order to petition for renewal of the order as the petitioner. The petitioner may, but is not required to, allege new facts and circumstances for which relief is sought that occurred after the order that protected the petitioner as a minor has expired.(c) The clerk shall issue a new cause number for renewals granted under this subsection and shall include the previously ordered protection order and petition for renewal in the new case file.(11) The court may award court costs, service fees, and reasonable attorneys' fees to the petitioner as provided in RCW 7.105.310.(((11)))(12) If the court declines to renew the protection order, the court shall state, in writing in the order, the particular reasons for the court's denial. If the court declines to renew a protection order that had restrained the respondent from having contact with children protected by the order, the court shall determine on the record whether the respondent and the children should undergo reunification therapy. Any reunification therapy provider should be made aware of the respondent's history of domestic violence and should have training and experience in the dynamics of intimate partner violence.(((12)))(13) In determining whether there has been a substantial change in circumstances for respondents under the age of 18, or in determining the appropriate duration for an order, the court shall consider the circumstances surrounding the respondent's youth at the time of the initial behavior alleged in the petition for a protection order. The court shall consider developmental factors, including the impact of time of a youth's development, and any information the minor respondent presents about his or her personal progress or change in circumstances.Sec. 4. RCW 7.105.500 and 2024 c 298 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:This section applies to modification or termination of domestic violence protection orders, sexual assault protection orders, stalking protection orders, and antiharassment protection orders.(1) Upon a motion with notice to all parties and after a hearing, the court may modify the terms of an existing protection order or terminate an existing order.(2) A respondent's motion to modify or terminate an existing protection order must include a declaration setting forth facts supporting the requested order for modification or termination. The nonmoving parties to the proceeding may file opposing declarations. All motions to modify or terminate shall be based on the written materials and evidence submitted to the court. The court shall set a hearing only if the court finds that adequate cause is established. If the court finds that the respondent established adequate cause, the court shall set a date for hearing the respondent's motion, which must be at least 14 days from the date the court finds adequate cause.(3) Upon the motion of a respondent, the court may not modify or terminate an existing protection order unless the respondent proves by a preponderance of the evidence that there has been a substantial change in circumstances such that the respondent will not resume, engage in, or attempt to engage in, the following acts against the petitioner or those persons protected by the protection order if the order is terminated or modified:(a) Acts of domestic violence, in cases involving domestic violence protection orders;(b) Physical or nonphysical contact, or acts of commercial sexual exploitation, in cases involving sexual assault protection orders;(c) Acts of stalking, in cases involving stalking protection orders; or(d) Acts of unlawful harassment, in cases involving antiharassment protection orders.The petitioner bears no burden of proving that he or she has a current reasonable fear of harm by the respondent.(4) In determining whether there has been a substantial change in circumstances, the court may consider the following unweighted factors, and no inference is to be drawn from the order in which the factors are listed:(a) Whether the respondent has committed or threatened sexual assault, commercial sexual exploitation, domestic violence, stalking, or other harmful acts against the petitioner or any other person since the protection order was entered;(b) Whether the respondent has violated the terms of the protection order and the time that has passed since the entry of the order;(c) Whether the respondent has exhibited suicidal ideation or attempts since the protection order was entered;(d) Whether the respondent has been convicted of criminal activity since the protection order was entered;(e) Whether the respondent has either acknowledged responsibility for acts of sexual assault, commercial sexual exploitation, domestic violence, stalking, or behavior that resulted in the entry of the protection order, or successfully completed state-certified perpetrator treatment or counseling since the protection order was entered;(f) Whether the respondent has a continuing involvement with drug or alcohol abuse, if such abuse was a factor in the protection order;(g) Whether the petitioner consents to terminating the protection order, provided that consent is given voluntarily and knowingly; or(h) Other factors relating to a substantial change in circumstances.(5) In determining whether there has been a substantial change in circumstances, the court may not base its determination on the fact that time has passed without a violation of the order.(6) Regardless of whether there is a substantial change in circumstances, the court may decline to terminate a protection order if it finds that the acts of domestic violence, sexual assault, commercial sexual exploitation, stalking, unlawful harassment, and other harmful acts that resulted in the issuance of the protection order were of such severity that the order should not be terminated.(7) A respondent may file a motion to modify or terminate an order no more than once in every 12-month period that the order is in effect, starting from the date of the order and continuing through any renewal period.(8) If a person who is protected by a protection order has a child or adopts a child after a protection order has been issued, but before the protection order has expired, the petitioner may seek to include the new child in the order of protection on an ex parte basis if the child is already in the physical custody of the petitioner. If the restrained person is the legal or biological parent of the child, a hearing must be set and notice given to the restrained person prior to final modification of the full protection order.(9) A court may require the respondent to pay the petitioner for costs incurred in responding to a motion to modify or terminate a protection order, including reasonable attorneys' fees.(10) A protected party may file a motion to terminate or modify an ex parte order without notice to the respondent if the respondent has not yet been served. For all other modifications or terminations of ex parte protection orders, a motion must be filed with notice given to all parties. A restrained person cannot modify or terminate an ex parte protection order without notice to the protected party.(11) Judicial officers presiding over full hearings who are reissuing temporary orders per RCW 7.105.200 may modify the terms of the ex parte order to remedy an error or based on the facts of the case.Sec. 5. RCW 9.41.040 and 2024 c 290 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree((, if)):(i) If the person owns, accesses, has in the person's custody, control, or possession, or receives any firearm after having previously been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity in this state or elsewhere of any serious offense; or(ii) If the person owns, accesses, has in the person's custody, control, or possession, or receives any untraceable or undetectable firearm during any period of time that the person is subject to an order described in subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section.(b) Unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree is a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.(2)(a) A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree, if the person does not qualify under subsection (1) of this section for the crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree and the person owns, accesses, has in the person's custody, control, or possession, or receives any firearm:(i) After having previously been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity in this state or elsewhere of:(A) Any felony not specifically listed as prohibiting firearm possession under subsection (1) of this section;(B) Any of the following crimes when committed by one family or household member against another or by one intimate partner against another, as those terms are defined by the statutes in effect at the time of the commission of the crime, committed on or after July 1, 1993: Assault in the fourth degree, coercion, stalking, reckless endangerment, criminal trespass in the first degree, or violation of the provisions of a protection order or no-contact order restraining the person or excluding the person from a residence (RCW 10.99.040 or any of the former RCW 26.50.060, 26.50.070, and 26.50.130);(C) Harassment when committed by one family or household member against another or by one intimate partner against another, as those terms are defined by the statutes in effect at the time of the commission of the crime, committed on or after June 7, 2018;(D) Any of the following misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor crimes not included under (a)(i) (B) or (C) of this subsection, committed on or after July 23, 2023: Domestic violence (RCW 10.99.020); stalking; cyberstalking; cyber harassment, excluding cyber harassment committed solely pursuant to the element set forth in RCW 9A.90.120(1)(a)(i); harassment; aiming or discharging a firearm (RCW 9.41.230); unlawful carrying or handling of a firearm (RCW 9.41.270); animal cruelty in the second degree committed under RCW 16.52.207(1); or any prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055(14) if committed within seven years of a conviction for any other prior offense under RCW 46.61.5055;(E) A violation of the provisions of a protection order under chapter 7.105 RCW restraining the person or excluding the person from a residence, when committed by one family or household member against another or by one intimate partner against another, committed on or after July 1, 2022; or(F) A violation of the provisions of an order to surrender and prohibit weapons, an extreme risk protection order, or the provisions of any other protection order or no-contact order not included under (a)(i) (B) or (E) of this subsection restraining the person or excluding the person from a residence, committed on or after July 23, 2023;(ii) During any period of time that the person is subject to a protection order, no-contact order, or restraining order by a court issued under chapter 7.105, 9A.40, 9A.44, 9A.46, 9A.88, 10.99, 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW or any of the former chapters 7.90, 7.92, 10.14, and 26.50 RCW that:(A) Was issued after a hearing for which the person received actual notice, and at which the person had an opportunity to participate, whether the court then issues a full order or reissues a temporary order. If the court enters an agreed order by the parties without a hearing, such an order meets the requirements of this subsection;(B) Restrains the person from harassing, stalking, or threatening the person protected under the order or child of the person or protected person, or others identified in the order, or engaging in other conduct that would place the protected person in reasonable fear of bodily injury to the protected person or child or others identified in the order; and(C)(I) Includes a finding that the person represents a credible threat to the physical safety of the protected person or child or others identified in the order, or by its terms explicitly prohibits the use, attempted use, or threatened use of physical force against the protected person or child or other persons that would reasonably be expected to cause bodily injury; or(II) Includes an order under RCW 9.41.800 requiring the person to surrender all firearms and prohibiting the person from accessing, having in his or her custody or control, possessing, purchasing, receiving, or attempting to purchase or receive, firearms;(iii) After having previously been involuntarily committed based on a mental disorder under RCW 71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740, 71.34.750, chapter 10.77 RCW, or equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction, unless his or her right to possess a firearm has been restored as provided in RCW 9.41.047;(iv) After dismissal of criminal charges based on incompetency to stand trial under RCW 10.77.086, or after dismissal of criminal charges based on incompetency to stand trial under RCW 10.77.088 when the court has made a finding indicating that the defendant has a history of one or more violent acts, unless his or her right to possess a firearm has been restored as provided in RCW 9.41.047;(v) If the person is under 18 years of age, except as provided in RCW 9.41.042; and/or(vi) If the person is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial for a serious offense as defined in RCW 9.41.010.(b) Unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree is a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.(3) A person shall not be precluded from possession of a firearm if the conviction has been the subject of a pardon, annulment, certificate of rehabilitation, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the person convicted or the conviction or disposition has been the subject of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of innocence. Where no record of the court's disposition of the charges can be found, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the person was not convicted of the charge.(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (2) of this section, a person convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of an offense prohibiting the possession of a firearm under this section other than murder, manslaughter, robbery, rape, indecent liberties, arson, assault, kidnapping, extortion, burglary, or violations with respect to controlled substances under RCW 69.50.401 and 69.50.410, who received a probationary sentence under RCW 9.95.200, and who received a dismissal of the charge under RCW 9.95.240, shall not be precluded from possession of a firearm as a result of the conviction or finding of not guilty by reason of insanity.(5) In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, if a person under the age of 18 years is found by a court to have possessed a firearm in a vehicle in violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section or to have committed an offense while armed with a firearm during which offense a motor vehicle served an integral function, the court shall notify the department of licensing within 24 hours and the person's privilege to drive shall be revoked under RCW 46.20.265, unless the offense is the juvenile's first offense in violation of this section and has not committed an offense while armed with a firearm, an unlawful possession of a firearm offense, or an offense in violation of chapter 66.44, 69.52, 69.41, or 69.50 RCW.(6) Nothing in chapter 129, Laws of 1995 shall ever be construed or interpreted as preventing an offender from being charged and subsequently convicted for the separate felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of a stolen firearm, or both, in addition to being charged and subsequently convicted under this section for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree. Notwithstanding any other law, if the offender is convicted under this section for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree and for the felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of a stolen firearm, or both, then the offender shall serve consecutive sentences for each of the felony crimes of conviction listed in this subsection.(7)(a) A person, whether an adult or a juvenile, commits the civil infraction of unlawful possession of a firearm if the person has in the person's possession or has in the person's control a firearm after the person files a voluntary waiver of firearm rights under RCW 9.41.350 and the form has been accepted by the clerk of the court and the voluntary waiver has not been lawfully revoked.(b) The civil infraction of unlawful possession of a firearm is a class 4 civil infraction punishable according to chapter 7.80 RCW.(c) Each firearm unlawfully possessed under this subsection (7) shall be a separate infraction.(d) The court may, in its discretion, order performance of up to two hours of community restitution in lieu of a monetary penalty prescribed for a civil infraction under this subsection (7).(8) Each firearm unlawfully possessed under this section shall be a separate offense.(9) A person may petition to restore the right to possess a firearm as provided in RCW 9.41.041.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 7.105 RCW to read as follows:Any full protection order or temporary protection order issued under this chapter after December 31, 2025, including any modifications thereof, must be typewritten in its entirety, as available in the local jurisdiction. This section does not apply to the signature of the issuing judge or court commissioner.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. Section 1 of this act takes effect March 31, 2026.--- END ---